Wyoming, session 2025, HB0283.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-124 is created to read:

1-39-124. Liability; enforcement of federal
regulation of firearms, firearm accessories, magazines and
ammunition.
HB0283

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0645

A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 9-14-203.

Section 2. W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ix), 1-39-104(a) and
9-14-203(a) through (c) and by creating new subsections (d)
through (f) are amended to read:

1-39-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(ix) "This act" means W.S. 1-39-101 through
1-39-120 1-39-124.

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112, and 1-39-122 and 1-39-123
through 1-39-124. Any immunity in actions based on a
HB0283

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0645
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

9-14-203. Prohibiting the enforcement of federal
regulation of firearms, firearm accessories, magazines and
ammunition; penalties; defense of Wyoming citizens.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section,
this state and all political subdivisions of this state are
prohibited from using any personnel or funds appropriated
by the legislature of the state of Wyoming, or any other
source of funds that originated within the state of Wyoming
or any federal funds or other source of funds to enforce,
administer or cooperate with attempt to enforce, provide
material aid, support or participate in any manner in the
enforcement or implementation of any unconstitutional act,
law, treaty, executive order, rule or regulation of the
United States government that infringes on or impedes the
free exercise of individual rights guaranteed under the
HB0283

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0645
Second Amendment of the Constitution of the United States
solely regarding firearms, accessories or ammunition
against any law abiding citizen.

(b) Nothing in this act shall limit or restrict a
public officer, as defined in W.S. 6-5-101(a)(v), from
providing assistance to federal authorities for purposes
not specifically identified in subsection (a) of this
section. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
prohibit Wyoming governmental entities from accepting
federal assistance or funds for law the enforcement
purposes of laws in this state.

(c) Any agency of the state, political subdivision or
law enforcement agency that employes any public officer, as
defined in W.S. 6-5-101(a)(v), or peace officer, as defined
in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv), who knowingly violates subsection
(a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable
by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of
not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both any
provision of this act against any law abiding citizen while
acting under the direction of an official, agent, employee
or deputy of the United States government, or otherwise
HB0283

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0645
acting under the color of federal or state law, shall be
liable to the injured party for damages resulting from the
public officer's or peace officer's conduct in a civil
action before a court of competent jurisdiction. The court,
upon finding a violation of this act, shall impose a civil
penalty against the agency, political subdivision or law
enforcement agency in an amount of fifty thousand dollars
($50,000.00) per violation and may order any injunctive or
other equitable relief as permitted by law. The court shall
hold a hearing on a motion for injunctive or equitable
relief within thirty (30) days of service of the petition.
In addition:

(i) An interested party may bring a civil action
to enforce the provisions of this act. A court of competent
jurisdiction may order injunctive or other equitable
relief, recovery of damages or other legal remedies
permitted by law and payment of reasonable attorney fees;

(ii) Sovereign immunity shall not be an
affirmative defense in any action pursuant to this
subsection.

HB0283

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0645
(d) Any agency of the state, political subdivision or
law enforcement agency that employs any public officer, as
defined in W.S. 6-5-101(a)(v), or peace officer, as defined
in W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv), who previously acted as an
official, agent, employee or deputy of the United States
government, and who knowingly commits any of the following
acts on or after July 1, 2025 shall be subject to a civil
penalty of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for each
such employee employed by the agency of the state,
political subdivision or law enforcement agency who:

(i) Enforces, attempts to enforce or
participates in any manner in the enforcement or
implementation of any federal act, executive order,
administrative order, rule, regulation, statute or
ordinance solely regarding firearms, accessories or
ammunition;

(ii) Gives material aid or support to the
efforts of another in the enforcement or implementation of
any federal act, executive order, administrative order,
rule, regulation, statute or ordinance solely regarding
firearms, accessories or ammunition.
HB0283

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0645

(e) A person does not violate the provisions of this
act when:

(i) The person provides material aid to federal
officers in pursuit of a suspect when there is a
demonstrable criminal nexus with another state or country
and such suspect is either not a citizen of this state or
is not present in this state;

(ii) The person provides material aid to federal
prosecutors for felony violations involving controlled
substances or violations against another person when such
prosecution includes weapons violations substantially
similar to the laws of this state if such weapons
violations are ancillary to such prosecution;

(iii) Accepting federal assistance for the
enforcement of the laws of this state.

(f) As used in this section:

HB0283

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0645
(i) "Law abiding citizen" means a person who is
not otherwise precluded under state law from possessing a
firearm and shall not be construed to include anyone who is
not legally present in the United States or the state of
Wyoming;

(ii) "Material aid" includes but is not limited
to voluntarily giving or allowing others to make use of
lodging, communications equipment or services including
social media accounts, facilities, weapons, personnel,
transportation, clothing or other physical assets.
"Material aid" shall not include the giving or allowing the
use of medicine or other materials necessary to treat
physical injuries or assistance provided to help persons
escape a serious and present risk of life threatening
injuries.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0283